Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Health Provisions.
§ 22.1-273.
Vision and hearing of student to be tested; exceptions.

As used in this section:“Comprehensive vision program” means a program that incorporates the following quality-controlled requirements:

Program staff who perform vision screenings and administer and maintain student paperwork and data related to such screenings are credentialed pursuant to a credentialing process that includes training and certification on vision screening equipment; documentation of negative tuberculosis risk assessment or screening, as required by local school boards; and documentation from the employing qualified nonprofit vision health organization certifying completion of a search of the registry of founded complaints of child abuse and neglect maintained by the Department of Social Services pursuant to §

63.2-1515

and a search of the Central Criminal Records Exchange through the Federal Bureau of Investigation based on fingerprints and personal descriptive information for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information;

The vision screening program is based on best practices as determined by scientific research and program performance and is evaluated by an advisory council consisting of (i) representatives of the ophthalmology and optometry fields and (ii) members from elementary and secondary education and school health to support the implementation of best practices and administrative policies to ensure compliance with Department of Education requirements;

Vision screening results are communicated to parents in a relevant and informative format that is designed to increase parental awareness and encourage parental action;

Parents receive information on the difference between vision screenings and eye examinations, the importance of taking action on a referral for an eye examination by taking their child to a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist, the identification of potential vision problems beyond the results or scope of the vision screening, and the importance of vision to a child’s education and success;

Parents are provided with information regarding follow-up resources related to eye examinations and eyeglasses; and

Vision screening results are managed for the purposes of reporting, outcome measurement, and program analysis.“Qualified nonprofit vision health organization” means a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, has at least 10 years of direct experience in the delivery of vision and vision education services, and does not directly or indirectly derive profit from the sale of vision equipment, insurance, medication, merchandise, or vision-related products.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare or cause to be prepared, with the advice and approval of the State Health Commissioner, suitable appliances for testing the hearing of the students in the public schools and necessary instructions for the use thereof. The Department of Education shall furnish the same free of expense to all schools in a school division upon request of the school board of such division accompanied by a resolution of the school board directing the use of such appliances in the schools of the school division.

Within the time periods and at the grades provided in regulations promulgated by the Board, the principal of each such school shall cause the hearing of the relevant students in the school to be tested, unless:

Any such student is admitted for the first time to a public elementary school and has been so tested as part of the comprehensive physical examination required by § 22.1-270;

The parents or guardians of any such student object on religious grounds and the student shows no obvious evidence of any defect or disease of the ears; or

Any such student has an Individualized Education Program or a Section 504 Plan that documents a defect of hearing or a disease of the ears and the principal determines that such a test would not identify any previously unknown defect of hearing or a disease of the ears.

The principal shall keep a record of examinations conducted pursuant to subsection C in accordance with instructions furnished.

Whenever a student is found to have any defect of hearing or a disease of the ears, the principal shall forthwith notify the parent or guardian, in writing, of such defect or disease. Copies of the report shall be preserved for the use of the Superintendent of Public Instruction as he may require.

The principal of each public elementary school shall cause the vision of students enrolled in kindergarten and students enrolled in grade two or grade three to be tested, unless:

Any such student is admitted for the first time to a public elementary school and produces a written record of a comprehensive eye examination performed within the preceding 24 months;

The parents or guardians of such student object on religious grounds and the student shows no obvious evidence of any defect or disease of the eyes; or

Any such student has an Individualized Education Program or a Section 504 Plan that documents a defect of vision or a disease of the eyes and the principal determines that such a test would not identify any previously unknown defect of vision or a disease of the eyes.Any such screening may be conducted by a qualified nonprofit vision health organization that uses a digital photoscreening method pursuant to a comprehensive vision program or other methods that comply with Department of Education requirements. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such screenings may be conducted at any time during the school year; however, the scheduling of such screenings shall be completed no later than the sixtieth administrative working day of the school year. The principal shall keep a record of such screenings in accordance with instructions furnished. Whenever a student does not receive a passing result on such screening and requires referral to an optometrist or ophthalmologist for a comprehensive eye examination, the principal shall cause the parent or guardian to be notified in writing. Copies of the report shall be preserved for the use of the Superintendent of Public Instruction as he may require.

The principal of each public middle school and high school shall cause the vision of students enrolled in grade seven and grade 10 to be tested, unless:

Any such student produces a written record of a comprehensive eye examination performed within the preceding 24 months;

The parents or guardians of any such student object on religious grounds and the student shows no obvious evidence of any defect or disease of the eyes; or

Any such student has an Individualized Education Program or a Section 504 Plan that documents a defect of vision or a disease of the eyes and the principal determines that such a test would not identify any previously unknown defect of vision or a disease of the eyes.Any such screening may be conducted by a qualified nonprofit vision health organization that uses a digital photoscreening method pursuant to a comprehensive vision program or other methods that comply with Department of Education requirements. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such screenings may be conducted at any time during the school year; however, the scheduling of such screenings shall be completed no later than the sixtieth administrative working day of the school year. The principal shall keep a record of such screenings in accordance with instructions furnished. Whenever a student does not receive a passing result on such screening and requires referral to an optometrist or ophthalmologist for a comprehensive eye examination, the principal shall cause the parent or guardian to be notified in writing. Copies of the report shall be preserved for the use of the Superintendent of Public Instruction as he may require.

School boards may enter into contracts with qualified nonprofit vision health organizations for the purpose of conducting screenings pursuant to subsections F and G.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-248; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 142; 1995, c. 246; 2017, cc. 312, 765.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 312 added subsections A, F, G, and H and inserted the subsection B and C designations; substituted “students” for “pupils” throughout; in subsection B, deleted “test cards, blanks, record books and other” preceding “appliances” in the first and second sentences, and deleted “sight and” preceding “hearing” in the first sentence; in subsection C, deleted “sight and” preceding “hearing,” deleted “kindergarten or” preceding “elementary” and deleted “eyes or” preceding “ears” in the first sentence and deleted “vision or” preceding “hearing” and “eyes or” preceding “ears” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 765 substituted “student” for “pupil” throughout the section; added the subsection designations and made related changes; deleted “State” preceding “Department of Education” in subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “of Education” following “Board,” and “such students are pupils” following “unless,” and added subdivision C 3; inserted “conducted pursuant to subsection C” in subsection D; and made stylistic changes. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-273.1.
Annual screening for scoliosis.

Within the time periods specified in regulations promulgated by the Board of Education, each school board shall provide parent educational information or implement a program of regular screening for scoliosis for pupils in grades five through ten, unless such students are pupils admitted for the first time to a public school who have been so tested as part of the comprehensive physical examination required by § 22.1-270 or the parents of such students have indicated their preference that their children not participate in such screening. Local school boards shall develop procedures for parents to indicate such preference.

The Board of Education shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of such screenings, which shall address, but shall not be limited to, requirements and training for school personnel and volunteers who may conduct such screenings; procedures for the notification of parents when evidence of scoliosis is detected; and such other provisions as the Board deems necessary. Local school divisions may seek volunteers from among professional health care providers.

History.

2003, c. 894.

§ 22.1-273.2.
Parent educational information regarding eating disorders.

Each school board shall annually provide parent educational information regarding eating disorders for pupils in grades five through 12. Such information shall be consistent with guidelines set forth by the Department of Education.

History.

2013, c. 715.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 715, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall develop and implement policies for providing parent educational information regarding eating disorders. The Department of Education and the Department of Health shall develop policies with input from organizations and entities including local school boards, school superintendents, the National Eating Disorders Association, the Virginia Association of School Nurses, the Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the Virginia Academy of Family Physicians. In doing so, the Department of Education and the Department of Health shall identify and develop appropriate additions or revisions to the Virginia School Health Guidelines related to development of parent educational information, including guidance regarding the clear delineation of such health information from other administrative documentation. Additionally, the Department of Education and the Department of Health shall develop appropriate guidelines for local school boards regarding (i) the optional development of an eating disorder screening program; (ii) specification of training needs and requirements for personnel and volunteers; (iii) appropriate opt-out and exemption procedures; (iv) parental notification procedures for positive indications of an eating disorder; and (v) any issues requiring statutory or regulatory amendment. Such Departments shall provide guidelines to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for dissemination by no later than July 1, 2013.”

§ 22.1-273.3.
Parent educational information regarding tobacco and nicotine vapor products.

Each school board shall annually provide educational information to parents of pupils in grades kindergarten through 12 regarding the health dangers of tobacco and nicotine vapor products. Such information shall be consistent with guidelines set forth by the Department of Education.

History.

2020, c. 679.

§ 22.1-273.4.
Department of Education; guidance and resources; applied behavior analysis services.

The Department of Education shall develop and publish no later than November 16, 2020, guidance and resources relating to the provision of applied behavior analysis (ABA) services in public schools for students who are in need of such services. Such guidance and resources may address (i) determining the need for and appropriateness of providing ABA services for students during the school day; (ii) considerations for school boards regarding management and monitoring of personnel who are not employed by the school board and who provide ABA services in public schools; (iii) the financial responsibilities related to hiring and retaining personnel who are not employed by the school board and who provide ABA services in public schools; (iv) developing agreements between such providers of ABA services, families, and schools; and (v) utilizing licensed behavior analysts employed by the school board to provide ABA services.

History.

2020, c. 774.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 774 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-274.
School health services.

A school board shall provide pupil personnel and support services in compliance with § 22.1-253.13:2. A school board may employ school nurses, physicians, physical therapists, occupational therapists, and speech therapists. No such personnel shall be employed unless they meet such standards as may be determined by the Board. Subject to the approval of the appropriate local governing body, a local health department may provide personnel for health services for the school division.

In implementing subsection P of § 22.1-253.13:2, relating to providing support services that are necessary for the efficient and cost-effective operation and maintenance of its public schools, each school board may strive to employ, or contract with local health departments for, nursing services consistent with a ratio of at least one nurse per 1,000 students. In those school divisions in which there are more than 1,000 students in average daily membership in school buildings, this section shall not be construed to encourage the employment of more than one nurse per school building. Further, this section shall not be construed to mandate the aspired-to ratios.

The Board shall monitor the progress in achieving the ratio set forth in subsection B and any subsequent increase in prevailing statewide costs, and the mechanism for funding health services, pursuant to subsection P of § 22.1-253.13:2 and the appropriation act. The Board shall also determine how school health funds are used and school health services are delivered in each locality.

With the exception of school administrative personnel and persons employed by school boards who have the specific duty to deliver health-related services, no licensed instructional employee, instructional aide, or clerical employee shall be disciplined, placed on probation, or dismissed on the basis of such employee’s refusal to (i) perform nonemergency health-related services for students or (ii) obtain training in the administration of insulin and glucagon. However, instructional aides and clerical employees may not refuse to dispense oral medications.

For the purposes of this subsection, “health-related services” means those activities that, when performed in a health care facility, must be delivered by or under the supervision of a licensed or certified professional.

Each school board shall ensure that in school buildings with an instructional and administrative staff of 10 or more (i) at least three employees have current certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an automated external defibrillator and (ii) if one or more students diagnosed as having diabetes attend such school, at least two employees have been trained in the administration of insulin and glucagon. In school buildings with an instructional and administrative staff of fewer than 10, school boards shall ensure that (a) at least two employees have current certification or training in emergency first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an automated external defibrillator and (b) if one or more students diagnosed as having diabetes attend such school, at least one employee has been trained in the administration of insulin and glucagon. For purposes of this subsection, “employee” includes any person employed by a local health department who is assigned to the public school pursuant to an agreement between the local health department and the school board. When a registered nurse, nurse practitioner, physician, or physician assistant is present, no employee who is not a registered nurse, nurse practitioner, physician, or physician assistant shall assist with the administration of insulin or administer glucagon. Prescriber authorization and parental consent shall be obtained for any employee who is not a registered nurse, nurse practitioner, physician, or physician assistant to assist with the administration of insulin and administer glucagon.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-241; 1956, c. 656; 1980, c. 559; 1990, c. 797; 1991, c. 295; 1994, c. 712; 1997, c. 597; 1998, c. 871; 1999, cc. 570, 757; 2013, cc. 498, 530; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 454; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 797, which amended this section, in cl. 3 provided that the provisions of the 1990 act would become effective July 1, 1992. However, Acts 1991, c. 295, cl. 1 amended Acts 1990, c. 797, cl. 3, to make the amendatory provisions of the 1990 act effective July 1, 1991.

Acts 2013, cc. 498 and 530, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, in conjunction with the Department of Health, shall adopt regulations and establish guidelines to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 445, cl. 1 provides “§ 1. The Virginia’s Children’s Cabinet established by the Governor pursuant to Executive Order No. 11 (2018) shall establish a school-based health centers joint task force (the joint task force) that includes representatives from the General Assembly, the Department of Health, the Department of Education, the Department of Medical Assistance Services, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Office of Children’s Services, and all other relevant state agencies and stakeholder groups deemed appropriate, who shall be tasked with (i) assessing the current landscape of school-based services and mental health screening, evaluation, and treatment in school settings; (ii) in coordination with ongoing behavioral health transformation efforts of the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, developing best practice recommendations for trauma-informed school-based health centers as a vehicle for the provision of both medical and behavioral health services delivered in school settings; (iii) evaluating options for billing public and private insurance for school-based health services; and (iv) developing a plan for establishing a Virginia affiliate member organization, recognized by the national School-Based Health Alliance, for the purposes of providing technical assistance and guidance for localities interested in bolstering or implementing current and future school-based health centers. The joint task force shall work in coordination with the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and may serve as an advisory body to other relevant committees, commissions, and members of the General Assembly on school-based health matters. The joint task force shall hold a minimum of four meetings and shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Education and Health and the House Committees on Education and Health, Welfare and Institutions by December 1, 2019.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Finance Committee” in subsection C. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 570, in subsection D, inserted “(i),” and added “or (ii) obtain training in the administration of insulin and glucagon” at the end of the paragraph; in subsection E, substituted “(i) at least two” for “at least two instructional or administrative,” inserted “and (ii) if one or more students diagnosed as having diabetes attend such school, at least two employees have been trained in the administration of insulin and glucagon,” substituted “(i) at least one” for “at least one instructional or administrative,” and added the language beginning “and (ii) if one or more students” at the end of the subsection.

The 1999 amendment by c. 757, in subsection D, substituted the clause beginning “With the exception” and ending “clerical employee” for “Effective July 1, 1998,” substituted “on the basis of such” for “because of the instructional,” and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 498 and 530 are identical, and substituted “that” for “which” in the second paragraph of subsection D; in subsection E, substituted the clause (a) and (b) designators for former clause (i) and (ii) designators, and in clause (i), substituted “three employees” for “two employees,” inserted “or training” and “emergency first aid,” and substituted “and the use of an automated external defibrillator” for “or have received training, within the last two years, in emergency first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation,” rewrote clause (a) which read: “at least one employee has current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation or has received training, within the last two years, in emergency first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation and,” substituted “includes” for “shall include” in the second sentence; and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 454, effective July 1, 2021, in subsections B and C, substituted “subsection P” for “subsection O.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsections A and C, deleted “of Education” following “Board”; in subsection B, deleted “(i) per 2,500 students by July 1, 1996; (ii) per 2,000 students by July 1, 1997; (iii) per 1,500 students by July 1, 1998; and (iv)” and “by July 1, 1999” preceding and following “per 1,000 students,” respectively; in subsection C, substituted “ratio” for “ratios” and deleted “and shall provide, by December 1, 1994, a detailed analysis of school health expenditures to the House Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Education and Health, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” at the end; added “For purposes of this subsection” in subsection E in the third sentence at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-274.01.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-274.01, which established the School Nurse Incentive Grants Program and Fund, was derived from Acts 1998, c. 904.

§ 22.1-274.01:1.
Students who are diagnosed with diabetes; self-care; insertion and reinsertion of insulin pump.

Each local school board shall permit each enrolled student who is diagnosed with diabetes, with parental consent and written approval from the prescriber, as that term is defined in §

54.1-3401

, to (i) carry with him and use supplies, including a reasonable and appropriate short-term supply of carbohydrates, an insulin pump, and equipment for immediate treatment of high and low blood glucose levels, and (ii) self-check his own blood glucose levels on a school bus, on school property, and at a school-sponsored activity.

A local school board employee who is a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or certified nurse aide and who has been trained in the administration of insulin, including the use and insertion of insulin pumps, and the administration of glucagon may assist a student who is diagnosed with diabetes and who carries an insulin pump with the insertion or reinsertion of the pump or any of its parts. For the purposes of this subsection, “employee” has the same meaning as in subsection E of § 22.1-274. Prescriber authorization and parental consent shall be obtained for any such employee to assist with the insertion or reinsertion of the pump or any of its parts. Nothing in this section shall require any employee to assist with the insertion or reinsertion of the pump or any of its parts.

History.

2014, cc. 488, 554; 2017, c. 811.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 488 and 554, cl. 2 provides: “That by July 1, 2015, the Department of Education shall review and update its Manual for Training Public School Employees in the Administration of Insulin and Glucagon to address training requirements for school personnel in the identification and management of symptoms of high and low blood glucose levels, the administration of medications to treat high and low blood glucose levels, the use of diabetes medication management devices, and the operation of glucose monitoring equipment. The Manual shall include training requirements in (i) administering a bolus of insulin via an insulin pump, (ii) entering a blood sugar reading into an insulin pump, (iii) entering a carbohydrate count into an insulin pump, (iv) removing or stopping the flow of insulin from an insulin pump, and (v) changing the battery in an insulin pump.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 811 designated the existing paragraph as subsection A, and added subsection B.

§ 22.1-274.02.
Certain memorandum of agreement required.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee and the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services or his designee shall develop and execute a memorandum of agreement relating to special education health services. This memorandum of agreement shall be revised on a periodic basis; however, the agreement shall, at a minimum, be revised and executed within six months of the inauguration of a new governor in order to maintain policy integrity.

The agreement shall include, but need not be limited to, (i) requirements for regular and consistent communications and consultations between the two departments and with school division personnel and officials and school board representatives; (ii) a specific and concise description and history of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), a summary of school division responsibilities pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, and a summary of any corresponding state law which influences the scope of these responsibilities; (iii) a specific and concise summary of the then-current Department of Medical Assistance Services regulations regarding the special education health services; (iv) assignment of the specific responsibilities of the two state departments for the operation of special education health services; (v) a schedule of issues to be resolved through the regular and consistent communications process, including, but not limited to, ways to integrate and coordinate care between the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ managed care providers and special education health services providers; (vi) a process for the evaluation of the services which may be delivered by school divisions participating as special education health services providers pursuant to Medicaid; (vii) a plan and schedule to reduce the administrative and paperwork burden of Medicaid participation on school divisions in Virginia; and (viii) a mechanism for informing primary care providers and other case management providers of those school divisions that are participating as Medicaid providers and for identifying such school divisions as Medicaid providers that are available to receive referrals to provide special education health services.

The Board of Education shall cooperate with the Board of Medical Assistance Services in developing a form to be included with the Individualized Education Plan (IEP) that shall be accepted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services as the plan of care (POC) and in collecting the data necessary to establish separate and specific Medicaid rates for the IEP meetings and other services delivered by school divisions to students.The POC form shall (i) be consistent with the plan of care required by the Department of Medical Assistance Services of other Medicaid providers, (ii) allow for written updates, (iii) be used by all school divisions participating as Medicaid providers of special education health services, (iv) document the student’s progress, and (v) be integrated and coordinated with the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ managed care providers.

The Department of Education shall prepare, upon consultation with the Department of Medical Assistance Services, a consent form which (i) is separate from the IEP, (ii) includes a statement noting that such form is not part of the student’s IEP, (iii) includes a release to authorize billing of school-based health services delivered to the relevant student by the school division, and (iv) shall be used by all school divisions participating in Medicaid reimbursement. This consent form shall be made available to the parents upon conclusion of the IEP meeting. The release shall allow for billing of school-based health services by Virginia school divisions to the Virginia Medicaid program and other programs operated by the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The Department of Education and the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall also develop a cost-effective, efficient, and appropriate process to allow school divisions access to eligibility data for students for whom consent has been obtained.

History.

1999, cc. 967, 1005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, cc. 967 and 1005, cl. 2, provides: “That the Boards of Education and Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate all necessary regulations to implement the provisions of this act within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 1999, cc. 967 and 1005, cl. 3, provides: “That the Departments of Education and Medical Assistance Services shall report on or before December 1 of each year to the chairmen of the Senate Committees on Education and Health and Finance and the House Committees on Education, Health, Welfare and Institutions, Finance, and Appropriations on the status of the special education health services and pilot school/community health centers and any issues which may arise. Such report may be delivered in writing or orally, upon the agreement of the relevant chairmen.”

§ 22.1-274.1.
Criteria to identify toxic art materials; labeling; use in certain grades prohibited.

The State Department of Education, in cooperation with the State Department of Health, shall develop criteria to identify toxic art materials.

After these criteria have been developed, the Department of Education shall require school divisions to evaluate all art materials used in schools and identify those which are toxic. All materials used in the public schools which meet the criteria as toxic shall be so labeled and the use of such art materials shall be prohibited in kindergarten through grade five.

History.

1987, c. 225; 1988, c. 103.